District of Columbia statutes.
25-601.01

Certain documents to be made available.

An ANC, or citizens association meeting the requirements of § 25-601(3), may request from ABRA or the Board a copy of a contract to which a licensee is a party, an incident log kept by a licensee, or similar document, if obtained by ABRA or the Board pursuant to this title.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(v), 60 DCR 3410

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(v) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).